Washington statutes.
RCW 9.03.040

Keeping or storing equipment for sale.

Any person who keeps or stores refrigerators, iceboxes, or deep freeze lockers for the purpose of selling or offering them for sale shall not be guilty of a violation of this chapter if he or she takes reasonable precautions to effectively secure the door of any refrigerator, icebox, or deep freeze locker held for purpose of sale so as to prevent entrance of children small enough to fit into such articles.

[ 2011 c 336 s 287; 1955 c 298 s 4.]